Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, §§ 4-8.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, §§ 1-5.

Sec. 14.42.010.
Purpose, intent.

[Repealed, § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001.]

The legislature affirms that the legal authority for the operation and management of the statewide university system remains with the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska and the legal authority for the operation and management of other postsecondary educational programs remains with the governing boards of the other private nonprofit and proprietary institutions in the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974; am § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.901

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.42.015.
Creation, composition, appointment of members.

There is in the Department of Education and Early Development the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education consisting of

two members of the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska designated by the members of that body;

one person representing private nonprofit higher education in the state appointed by the governor;

one person representing the Department of Education and Early Development selected by the state Board of Education and Early Development;

four persons broadly and equitably representative of the general public appointed by the governor;

one member of the Alaska Workforce Investment Board established by AS

23.15.550

designated by the members of that body;

one person from the members of the local community college advisory councils appointed by the governor;

two members from the legislature, one of whom shall be appointed by the president of the senate and one by the speaker of the house of representatives;

one person appointed in accordance with (e) of this section who is a full-time student as defined in AS

14.43.160

;

one administrator appointed by the governor from a proprietary institution of postsecondary education that has an authorization to operate in the state issued under AS 14.48.

No governing body member, trustee, official, or employee of either a public, private, or proprietary institution of postsecondary or higher education in the state may be appointed to membership on the commission as representative of the general public for the purpose of (a)(4) of this section.

The governor’s appointees are subject to confirmation by the legislature and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor for four-year staggered terms. Members appointed or designated by bodies or agencies other than the governor serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointment.

A full-time postsecondary student shall be appointed to the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education from a list of nominees submitted to the governor. The governor shall make the appointment from the list within 60 days after it is submitted. The list must consist of the names of two or more nominees from private nonprofit institutions of higher education in the state and two nominees from each campus of the University of Alaska. The nominees shall be selected by the students at private nonprofit institutions of higher education and each campus of the University of Alaska by an election held on each campus. Elections under this subsection shall be held concurrently with student regent elections required under AS

14.40.150(b)

and conducted under rules established by the Office of the Governor. If a private nonprofit institution of higher education in the state does not have an organized student governance structure to hold elections, the institution’s governing board may nominate a full-time student and forward the name to the governor for consideration. The term of office of the student member of the commission is two years and begins June 1 of the year in which the appointment is made. Membership on the commission is immediately forfeited by a student member who ceases to be a full-time student. Within 60 days after a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a successor from those students appearing on the list of nominees to serve for the unexpired term of the original appointee. The term “campus” used in this subsection means a portion of the University of Alaska designated as a “campus” by the Board of Regents.

For the purpose of (a)(4) of this section, “broadly and equitably representative of the general public” means that the public membership of the commission shall include adequate representation both on the basis of sex and on the basis of the significant racial, ethnic, geographic, and economic groups in the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 64 SLA 1982; am § 56 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 61 SLA 1995; am § 12 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 2002; am §§ 11, 12 ch 8 SLA 2011; am §§ 1, 2 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.903

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in paragraph (a)(3) in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000. In 2008, subsection (e) was relettered as (d) and subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, rewrote (a)(2) which read, “one person representing private higher education in the state selected jointly by the Boards of Trustees of Alaska Pacific University and Sheldon Jackson College from among their membership” and deleted references to “Sheldon Jackson College” from the third and fourth sentences in (d).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a)(2), inserted “nonprofit” following “representing private” near the beginning, and substituted “appointed by the governor” for “selected by the board of trustees of Alaska Pacific University from among its membership” at the end; in (d), in the third sentence, inserted “or more” following “names of two” and substituted “private nonprofit institutions of higher education in the state” for “Alaska Pacific University”, in the fourth sentence, substituted “private nonprofit institutions of higher education in the state” for “Alaska Pacific University”, and added the sixth sentence.

Sec. 14.42.020.
Officers.

The chairman and vice-chairman shall be elected from among the members of the commission for a one-year term. A member of the commission may not serve as chairman for more than two consecutive one-year terms.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.905. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.42.025.
Meetings, rules, votes required.

The commission shall prescribe its own rules of procedure. The commission shall meet once quarterly at a time and place determined by the chairman, and at other times and places as the chairman, or a majority of the members of the commission, consider necessary. A quorum is a majority of the members of the commission.
The votes of the commission members shall be recorded, and effective action requires the affirmative vote of a majority of the commission members present.
A commission member may not, with respect to a matter before the commission, vote for or on behalf of, or in any way exercise the vote of, another member of the commission.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.907

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.42.030.
Functions, duties, and powers of the commission.

The commission has the following functions, advisory to the governing boards of institutions of public and private higher education in this state, to the governor, the legislature, and to other appropriate state and federal officials:

coordinate the development of comprehensive plans for the orderly, systematic growth of public and private postsecondary education, including community colleges and occupational education, in the state and submit recommendations on the need for, and location of, new facilities and programs;

review and advise as to the efficiency and effectiveness of all consortia and other cooperative agreements between the institutions of public and private higher education in the state that are parties to them.

The commission shall

administer the financial aid and interstate education compact programs under AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.920

and

14.43.990

, and AS 14.44;

administer the provisions of AS 14.48 concerning regulation of postsecondary educational institutions;

resolve disputes under a consortium or other cooperative agreement between institutions of public and private higher education in the state; and

serve as the state agency required under 20 U.S.C. 1001 — 1155.

[Repealed, § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001.]

[Renumbered as AS

14.42.033

.]

The commission may

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to

carry out the purposes of

AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.849

,

14.43.990

, AS 14.44, and AS 14.48;

AS

14.43.910

and

14.43.920

as they relate to the purposes of AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.849

,

14.43.990

, AS 14.44, and AS 14.48; and

AS

14.42.035

and (7) and (8) of this subsection;

ensure compliance with the requirements imposed by state and federal statutes and regulations governing the guaranty, insurance, purchase, or other dealings in eligible loans by federal agencies, instrumentalities, or corporations; and

establish standards for the

administration of hearings conducted under AS

14.43.153

; and

administrative enforcement of collection orders under AS

14.43.151

—

14.43.155

;

delegate to the executive director of the commission or a subcommittee of the commission any duty imposed on or power granted to the commission by this chapter, AS 14.43, AS 14.44, or AS 14.48, except its power to adopt regulations and its duty to consider appeals under AS

14.43.100(b)

and AS

14.48.120

;

establish task forces, committees, or subcommittees, not necessarily consisting of commission members, to advise and assist the commission in carrying out its functions;

contract with or use existing institutions of postsecondary education or other individuals or organizations to make studies, conduct surveys, submit recommendations, or otherwise contribute to the work of the commission;

establish fees for the review of an out-of-state institution that

requests approval for participation in the programs under AS 14.43.091 —

14.43.750

, 14.43.990, and AS 14.44; and

is not accredited by a national or regional accreditation association recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation;

collect all fees and costs incurred in collection of the amount owed on a loan or repayment obligation if the loan or repayment obligation becomes delinquent or in default; in this paragraph, fees and costs include attorney fees, court costs, and collection fees charged by a collection agency;

if approved by the department, receive and analyze performance data for students in grades kindergarten through 12 and enter into contracts for the purpose of assessing education outcomes; and

administer a statewide workforce and education-related statistics program under AS

14.42.035

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 1976; am § 24 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1999; am §§ 2 — 4, 42 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 14 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.909

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2010, in the text of the amendment of (e)(1)(A) of this section effective July 1, 2011, “AS

14.43.849

” was substituted for “AS 14.43.850” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 14.43.850.

Cross references. —

For definition of “consortium,” see AS

14.42.055

.

For transitional provisions giving effect to regulations relating to scholarship applications under the Alaska merit scholarship program on or after January 1, 2011, see § 9, ch. 14, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For scholarship loans, see 20 AAC 15, art. 1.

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For AlaskAdvantage loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 3.

For AlaskAdvantage consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 4.

For family education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 7.

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, see 20 AAC 16.

For authorization to operate and agent’s permits, see 20 AAC 17, art. 1.

For authorization to operate as a college, junior college, community college, or university, see 20 AAC 17, art. 2.

For WICHE professional student exchange loan program, see 20 AAC 18.

For financial support for the WWAMI program, see 20 AAC 19.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, substituted “AS

14.43.091

— 14.43.850” for “AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.750

” in (e)(1)(A)(i) and (ii).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (e)(7) and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective June 19, 2018, in (e), added (e)(1)(iii), added (e)(8), and made related changes.

Sec. 14.42.032.
Limitation on awarding loans. [Repealed, § 26 ch 5 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 14.42.033.
Agreements for medical education.

The commission shall enter into agreements with government or postsecondary education officials of this state or other states to provide postsecondary educational services and programs to Alaska residents pursuing a medical education degree sufficient to accommodate at least 20 new program participants each year. An agreement with another state must be limited to services and programs that are unavailable in Alaska. The commission shall require a person participating in a medical education program offered under this section to agree to the repayment condition imposed under AS

14.43.510

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.42.030(d)

.
Renumbered in 2008, at which time “section” was substituted for “subsection” in the last sentence.

Cross references. —

For medical education financial support, see AS

14.43.510

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 54, SLA 1998 provides that this section [formerly AS

14.42.030(d)

], amended by § 1, ch. 54, SLA 1998 “applies to a person who is accepted into a graduate education program and who receives financial aid from the state under AS

14.44.010

—

14.44.040

, or for a medical education program under AS

14.42.030(d)

, on or after July 1, 1998.” Section 1, ch. 54, SLA 1998 added what is now the last sentence of this section.

Sec. 14.42.035.
Collection of data.

The commission may require the institutions of public and private higher education and other institutions of postsecondary education in the state to submit data on costs, selection, and retention of students, enrollments, education outcomes, plant capacities and use, and other matters pertinent to effective planning and coordination, and shall furnish information concerning these matters to the governor, to the legislature, and to other state and federal agencies as requested by them.

The commission may maintain a database containing information received under this section, AS

14.42.030(e)(7)

and (8), and AS

23.20.110

, for the purpose of compiling statewide workforce and education-related statistics and analyzing education and training outcomes. The commission may enter into cooperative agreements with state agencies, the University of Alaska, and other organizations to share data and information related to education and employment. The commission may not provide unit records to the federal government under this subsection.

The commission shall, for the purposes of this section and AS

14.42.030(e)(7)

and (8), remove personally identifiable information, including first name, last name, and middle name, social security number, student identification number, residential address, and mailing address, before placing the information in the database under (b) of this section. The commission is not required to remove the month or year of birth from a record under this subsection.

In this section, “unit record” means information pertaining to an individual.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 89 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.911

. Renumbered in 1982.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, inserted “education outcomes,” following “enrollments” and made a stylistic change.

The 2018 amendment, effective June 19, 2018, added (b) – (d).

Sec. 14.42.040.
Executive officer and staff; administration.

The commission may appoint an executive director as the commission’s executive officer. The executive officer is a member of the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

, serves at the pleasure of the commission, and receives compensation fixed by the commission. The executive officer appoints persons to the staff positions authorized by the commission, and staff compensation is fixed by the commission. Each employee of the commission shall elect membership either in the state teachers’ retirement system (AS 14.25), if qualified, or in the public employees’ retirement system (AS 39.35).

The Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education is not a division in the Department of Education and Early Development. The commission, its members, executive officer, and staff are in the Department of Education and Early Development for administrative support services only, and they are not subject to the direction of the commissioner of education and early development or the state Board of Education and Early Development.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.913

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” and “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in subsection (b) in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Sec. 14.42.045.
Compensation and per diem.

Members of the commission serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses as may be authorized by law for boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.915. Renumbered in 1982.

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel for boards and commissions, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 14.42.050.
Legal counsel.

The attorney general is legal counsel for the commission. The attorney general shall advise the commission in legal matters arising in the discharge of its duties and represent the commission in actions to which it is a party. If, in the opinion of the commission, the public interest is not adequately represented by counsel in a proceeding, the attorney general, upon request of the commission, shall represent the public interest.

The commission may employ temporary legal counsel from time to time in matters in which the commission is involved.

History.

(§ 3 ch 25 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.917

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.42.055.
Consortia.

All parties that are signatory to a consortium agreement between the University of Alaska and a private university or college must abide by a decision rendered by the commission when disagreements arise or exist between the parties. For purposes of this section and AS

14.42.030

, “consortium” means a cooperative arrangement between two or more public or private institutions of postsecondary education specified in agreements or memoranda of understanding to permit sharing of facilities, instructional opportunities, and other educational services in such a way that the integrity of each institution party to the consortium is preserved while at the same time the institutions cooperatively plan the academic calendar, scheduling, use of personnel and facilities, and educational programs and offerings to the maximum advantage of the students and faculties of the institutions that are parties to a consortium.

History.

(§ 8 ch 246 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.919. Renumbered in 1982.